test/src/gt-norm-yamls/U-all_gt-norm.yaml
     lähteet+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: lähđe
     lähteet+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lähtekkää
     
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: lähtemässä
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: lähtemästä
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: lähtemhään
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: lähtemällä
     lähteet+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: lähtemättä
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - laueta - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     laueta+V+Inf: laueta
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laukkeen
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: laukkeet
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laukkee
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: laukkeema
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: laukkeetta
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lauethaan
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laukesin
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: laukesit
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: laukes
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: laukesimma
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: laukesitta
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lauethiin
     laueta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lauenu
     laueta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: lauettu
     laueta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lauenheet
     laueta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: laukkeeva
     laueta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: laukkeevat
     laueta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lauettava
     laueta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lauettavat
     
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: laukkeisin
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: laukkeisit
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: laukkeis
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: laukkeisimma
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: laukkeisitta
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lauettais
     laueta+V+Pass+Cond: lauettais
    
     laueta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: laukkee
     laueta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lauekkaa
     
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: laukkeemassa
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: laukkeemasta
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: laukkeemhaan
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: laukkeemalla
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: laukkeematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lenttäät - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     lenttäät+V+Inf: lenttäät
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lennän
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lennät
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lenttää
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lennämä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lennättä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lennethään
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lensin
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lensit
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lensi
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lensimä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lensittä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lennethiin
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lentäny
     lenttäät+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: lennetty
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lentänheet
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lenttäävä
     lenttäät+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lenttäävät
     lenttäät+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lennettävä
     lenttäät+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lennettävät

     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: lentäisin
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: lentäisit
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: lentäis
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: lentäisimmä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: lentäisittä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lennettäis
     lenttäät+V+Pass+Cond: lennettäis

     lenttäät+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: lennä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lentäkkää
     
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: lentämässä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: lentämästä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: lentämhään
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: lentämällä
     lenttäät+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: lentämättä
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - laueta - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     liuota+V+Inf: liuota
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liukkeen
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: liukkeet
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liukkee
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: liukkeema
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: liukkeetta
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: liuethaan
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: liukesin
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: liukesit
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: liukes
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: liukesimma
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: liukesitta
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: liuethiin
     liuota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: liuenu
     liuota+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: liuettu
     liuota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: liuenheet
     liuota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: liukkeeva
     liuota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: liukkeevat
     liuota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: liuettava
     liuota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: liuettavat
     
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: liukkeisin
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: liukkeisit
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: liukkeis
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: liukkeisimma
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: liukkeisitta
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: liuettais
     liuota+V+Pass+Cond: liuettais
    
     liuota+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: liukkee
     liuota+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: liuekkaa
     
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: liukkeemassa
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: liukkeemasta
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: liukkeemhaan
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: liukkeemalla
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: liukkeematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lukkeet - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     lukkeet+V+Inf: lukkeet
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lujen
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lujet
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lukkee
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lujema
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lujetta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lujethaan
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lujin
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lujit
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luki
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lujima
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lujitta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lujethiin
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lukenu
     lukkeet+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: lujettu
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lukenheet
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lukkeeva
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lukkeevat
     lukkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lujettava
     lukkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lujettavat

     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: lukisin
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: lukisit
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: lukis
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: lukisimma
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: lukisitta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lujettais
     lukkeet+V+Pass+Cond: lujettais

     lukkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: luje
     lukkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lukekkaa
     
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: lukemassa
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: lukemasta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: lukemhaan
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: lukemalla
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: lukematta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - luottaat  - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     luottaat+V+Inf: luottaat
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luotan
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luotat
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luottaa
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luotama
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luotatta
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luotethaan
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luotin
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luotit
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luotti
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luotima
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luotitta
     luottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luotethiin
     luottaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: luottanu
     luottaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: luotettu
     luottaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: luottanheet
     luottaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: luottaava
     luottaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: luottaavat
     luottaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: luotettava
     luottaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: luotettavat
     
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: luottaisin
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: luottaisit
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: luottais
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: luottaisimma
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: luottaisitta
     luottaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: luotettais
     luottaat+V+Pass+Cond: luotettais
     
     luottaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: luota
     luottaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: luottakkaa
     
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: luottamassa
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: luottamasta
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: luottamhaan
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: luottamalla
     luottaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: luottamatta

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - nähđa  - ok : # Verb 'to do' - ok
     nähđä+V+Inf: nähđä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: näjen
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: näjet
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näkkee
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: näjemä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: näjettä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nähđhään
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: näjin
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: näjit
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: näki
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: näjimä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: näjittä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nähthiin
     nähđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nähny
     nähđä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: nähty
     nähđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: nähnheet
     nähđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: näkkeevä
     nähđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: näkkeevät
     nähđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nähtävä
     nähđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: nähtävät
     
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: näkisin
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: näkisit
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: näkis
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: näkisimmä
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: näkisittä
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: nähtäis
     nähđä+V+Pass+Cond: nähtäis
       
     nähđä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: näje
     nähđä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: nähkää
     
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: näkemässä
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: näkemästä
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: näkemhään
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: näkemällä
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: näkemättä

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - näkkyyt  - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     näkkyyt+V+Inf: näkkyyt
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nävyn
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nävyt
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näkkyy
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nävymä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nävyttä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nävythään
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nävyin
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nävyit
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: näkyi
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nävyimä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nävyittä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nävythiin
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: näkyny
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: nävytty
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: näkynheet
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: näkkyyvä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: näkkyyvät
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nävyttävä
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: nävyttävät
     
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: näkyisin
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: näkyisit
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: näkyis
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: näkyisimmä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: näkyisittä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: nävyttäis
     näkkyyt+V+Pass+Cond: nävyttäis
     
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: nävy
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: näkykkää
     
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: näkymässä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: näkymästä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: näkymhään
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: näkymällä
     näkkyyt+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: näkymättä
     

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
